en: Electrical Wires & Cable
xx: Electrical Wires & Cable
cs: Elektrické dráty a kabely
da: Elledninger
de: Elektrische Leitungen
es: Cables eléctricos
fr: Fils et câbles électriques
it: Fili e cavi elettrici
ja: 電線
nl: Elektrische bedrading
no: Strømledninger og kabler
pl: Kable i przewody elektryczne
pt: Fios e cabos elétricos
ru: Электрические провода и кабели
sv: Elkablar
tr: Elektrik Kabloları

en: Extension Cord Accessories
xx: Extension Cord Accessories
cs: Prodlužovací kabely – příslušenství
da: Forlængerledning – tilbehør
de: Verlängerungskabelzubehör
es: Accesorios para cables de extensión
fr: Accessoires pour rallonges
it: Accessori per prolunghe
ja: 延長コード関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor verlengsnoeren
no: Tilbehør til skjøteledninger
pl: Akcesoria do przedłużaczy
pt: Acessórios para fios de extensão
ru: Принадлежности для удлинителей
sv: Tillbehör till förlängningskablar
tr: Uzatma Kablosu Aksesuarları

en: Extension Cords
xx: Extension Cords
cs: Prodlužovací kabely
da: Forlængerledninger
de: Verlängerungskabel
es: Alargador eléctrico
fr: Rallonges électriques, Rallonge électrique
it: Prolunghe
ja: 延長コード
nl: Verlengsnoeren
no: Skjøteledninger
pl: Przedłużacze
pt: Cabos extensores
ru: Удлинители
sv: Förlängningskablar
tr: Uzatma Kabloları

en: Generator Accessories
xx: Generator Accessories
cs: Generátory – příslušenství
da: Generator – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Generatoren
es: Accesorios para generadores
fr: Accessoires pour générateurs
it: Accessori generatori
ja: 発電機関連用品
nl: Generatoraccessoires
no: Generatortilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do agregatów prądotwórczych
pt: Acessórios para gerador
ru: Принадлежности для генераторов
sv: Generatortillbehör
tr: Jeneratör Aksesuarları

en: Generators
xx: Generators
cs: Generátory
da: Generatorer
de: Generatoren
es: Generadores
fr: Générateurs
it: Generatori
ja: 発電機
nl: Generatoren
no: Generatorer
pl: Agregaty prądotwórcze
pt: Geradores
ru: Генераторы
sv: Generatorer
tr: Jeneratörler

en: Home Automation Kits
xx: Home Automation Kits
cs: Sady pro automatizaci domácnosti
da: Central styring af hjemmet
de: Heim- & Gebäudeautomatisierung
es: Kits de automatización doméstica
fr: Kits de domotique
it: Kit per la domotica
ja: ホームオートメーション
nl: Thuisautomatisering
no: Hjemmeautomatisering
pl: Automatyka domowa
pt: Kits de automação doméstica
ru: Наборы для автоматизации дома
sv: Hemautomatisering
tr: Ev Otomasyonu Setleri

en: Phone & Data Jacks
xx: Phone & Data Jacks
cs: Telefonní a síťové konektory
da: Telefon- og datastik
de: Telefon- & Internetbuchsen
es: Rosetas
fr: Connecteurs téléphone et réseau
it: Connettori telefono e dati
ja: キーストンジャック
nl: Telefoon- en netwerkaansluitingen
no: Data- og nettverksuttak
pl: Gniazda keystone
pt: Conectores fêmea para telefonia/dados
ru: Телефонные\, сетевые и мультимедйные розетки
sv: Keystoneuttag
tr: Telefon ve Veri Jakları

en: Power Converters
xx: Power Converters
cs: Měniče napětí
da: Strøm – omformere
de: Schaltnetzteile
es: Conversores de potencia
fr: Convertisseurs électriques
it: Convertitori di potenza
ja: AC-DCコンバーター
nl: Voedingsconverters
no: Strømadaptere
pl: Przetwornice napięcia
pt: Conversores de potência
ru: Преобразователи питания
sv: Strömkonverterare
tr: Güç Dönüştürücüler

en: Power Inlets
xx: Power Inlets
cs: Napájecí zásuvky
da: Strømstik
de: Gerätestecker
es: Entradas de alimentación
fr: Prises de courant mâles
it: Prese di corrente
ja: 電源インレット
nl: Toestelcontactdozen
no: Strøminntak
pl: Wtyczki elektryczne
pt: Tomadas
ru: Разъемы питания
sv: Elintag
tr: Elektrik Girişleri

en: Power Inverters
xx: Power Inverters
cs: Měniče DC-AC
da: Strøm – vekselrettere
de: Wechselrichter
es: Inversores de corriente
fr: Onduleurs, Onduleur électrique
it: Invertitori di corrente
ja: DC-ACインバーター
nl: Spanningsomzetters
no: Vekselrettere
pl: Falowniki
pt: Transformadores de energia
ru: Инверторы
sv: Växelriktare
tr: Güç Çeviriciler

en: Power Outlets & Sockets
xx: Power Outlets & Sockets
cs: Elektrické zásuvky
da: Stikdåser
de: Steckdosen
es: Enchufes de pared
fr: Prises de courant, Prise
it: Prese elettriche
ja: コンセント
nl: Stopcontacten en contactdozen
no: Stikkontakter og strømuttak
pl: Gniazdka ścienne
pt: Tomadas e soquetes
ru: Разъёмы и розетки электропитания
sv: Vägguttag
tr: Duvar Prizleri

en: Solar Energy Kits
xx: Solar Energy Kits
cs: Sady solárních panelů
da: Solenergisæt
de: Solarenergie-Kits
es: Kits de energía solar
fr: Kits d'énergie solaire
it: Kit fotovoltaici
ja: 太陽光発電システム
nl: Zonne-energiekits
no: Solenergisett
pl: Zestawy do instalacji słonecznych
pt: Kits de energia solar
ru: Комплекты солнечного электроснабжения
sv: Solenergipaket
tr: Güneş Enerjisi Kitleri

en: Solar Panels
xx: Solar Panels
cs: Solární panely
da: Solpaneler
de: Solarpaneele
es: Paneles solares
fr: Panneaux solaires, Panneau photovoltaïque, Panneaux photovoltaïques
it: Pannelli solari
ja: ソーラーパネル
nl: Zonnepanelen
no: Solpaneler
pl: Panele słoneczne
pt: Painéis solares
ru: Солнечные панели
sv: Solcellspaneler
tr: Güneş Enerjisi Panelleri

en: Voltage Transformers & Regulators
xx: Voltage Transformers & Regulators
cs: Transformátory a regulátory napětí
da: Spændingstransformatorer og spændingsregulatorer
de: Spannungswandler & -regler
es: Reguladores y transformadores de voltaje
fr: Transformateurs et régulateurs de tension, Transformateur électrique
it: Regolatori e trasformatori di tensione
ja: 変圧器・調整器
nl: Stroomregelaars en transformatoren
no: Spenningstransformatorer og -regulatorer
pl: Transformatory i regulatory napięcia
pt: Reguladores e transformadores de tensão
ru: Трансформаторы и регуляторы напряжения
sv: Spänningstransformatorer och -regulatorer
tr: Gerilim Transformatörleri ve Regülatörleri

en: Wall Plates & Covers
xx: Wall Plates & Covers
cs: Elektroinstalační nástěnné rámečky a kryty
da: Afdækninger til elektriske kontakter
de: Wandplatten
es: Placas de pared
fr: Plaques murales
it: Placche a muro e coperture
ja: スイッチ・コンセントプレート
nl: Afdekramen voor muurcontactdozen en -schakelaars
no: Dekkrammer og -plater
pl: Płyty ścienne
pt: Espelhos para tomadas e interruptores
ru: Рамки и крышки для электрических розеток и выключателей
sv: Täckramar
tr: Duvar Plakaları ve Kaplamaları

en: Wall Socket Controls & Sensors
xx: Wall Socket Controls & Sensors
cs: Ovladače a senzory do elektrické zásuvky
da: Elektriske timere og sensorer
de: Steckdosen-Zeitschaltuhren & -Sensoren
es: Controles y sensores eléctricos
fr: Commandes de prises murales et capteurs électriques
it: Controlli e sensori per prese
ja: 電気タイマー
nl: Plugin klokschakelaars en sensoren
no: Timere og sensorer til stikkontakter
pl: Kontrolki i sensory do gniazdek
pt: Sensores e controles de soquete de parede
ru: Таймеры и датчики для электрических розеток
sv: Elektriska timers
tr: Priz Kumandaları ve Sensörleri

en: Wire Caps & Nuts
xx: Wire Caps & Nuts
cs: Spojovací čepičky na kabely
da: Kabelhætter
de: Drahtbindemaschinen
es: Cubiertas protectoras y empalmes plásticos
fr: Capuchons de connexion
it: Tappi e dadi per cavi
ja: ワイヤーキャップ・ナット
nl: Kroonstenen\, lasdoppen en -klemmen
no: Koblingsklemmer
pl: Końcówki kablowe
pt: Tampas e cápsulas para fios
ru: Соединительные изолирующие зажимы
sv: Sladdproppar och Wire-Nuts
tr: Kablo Başlıkları ve Somunları

en: Wire Terminals & Connectors
xx: Wire Terminals & Connectors
cs: Koncovky a konektory
da: Forbindelsesklemmer
de: Kabelanschlüsse & Steckverbinder
es: Conectores y terminales de cables
fr: Bornes et connecteurs de fils électriques
it: Connettori e terminali cavo
ja: ケーブル端子・コネクター
nl: Kabelschoenen en -stekkers
no: Ledningsklemmer og -koblinger
pl: Końcówki\, zaciski i złączki
pt: Conectores e terminais de cabos
ru: Зажимы и соединители для проводов
sv: Trådklämmor och -förbindare
tr: Kablo Sonlandırıcılar ve Konektörler

en: Small Engines
xx: Small Engines
cs: Malé spalovací motory
da: Små motorer
de: Kleinmotoren
es: Motores pequeños
fr: Petits moteurs
it: Piccoli motori
ja: 小型エンジン
nl: Kleine motors
no: Små motorer
pl: Małe silniki
pt: Motores pequenos
ru: Двигатели малого объема
sv: Småmotorer
tr: Küçük Motorlar

en: Storage Tanks
xx: Storage Tanks
cs: Skladovací cisterny
da: Lagertanke
de: Vorratsbehälter
es: Depósitos de almacenamiento
fr: Réservoirs de stockage
it: Cisterne
ja: 貯蔵タンク
nl: Opslagtanks
no: Oppbevaringstanker
pl: Zbiorniki
pt: Tanques de armazenamento
ru: Емкости для хранения
sv: Förvaringstankar
tr: Saklama Tankları